02_Morphology/ru.twol
Alphabet
  а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я
  А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Т Г Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я
 
 %{Nom%}:0 %{Nom%}:а %{Nom%}:о %{Nom%}:ы %{Nom%}:и
 %{Acc%}:0 %{Acc%}:у %{Acc%}:ю
;

Sets

HardVow = а о э у ы ;
SoftVow = я ё е ю и ;

! rename this
WeirdCns = г к х ж ч ш щ ;

AllGender = %<ma%> %<fe%> %<ne%>

Rules

"Make nomitive plural stuff work right (archiphoneme {Pl})"
%{Pl%}:и <=> WeirdCns: AllGender: [%<nom%> | %<acc%>] _ ;

"Nominative singular masculine"
%{Nom%}:0 <=> %<ma%> %<nom%> _ ;
"Nominative singular femenine"
%{Nom%}:а <=> %<fe%> %<nom%> _ ;
"Nomintative singular neuter"
%{Nom%}:о <=> %<ne%> %<nom%> _ ;

"Nominative plural"
%{Nom%}:и <=> WeirdCns: [ <%ma%> | %<fe%> ] %<pl%> <%nom%> _ ;

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;
